Washington statutes.
RCW 19.184.030

Failure to conform with warranty—Remedy—Disclosure of returned wheelchair.

(1) If a new wheelchair does not conform to an applicable express warranty and the consumer reports the nonconformity to the manufacturer, the wheelchair lessor, or any of the manufacturer's authorized wheelchair dealers and makes the wheelchair available for repair before one year after first delivery of the wheelchair to the consumer, the nonconformity must be repaired.

(2) If, after a reasonable attempt to repair, the nonconformity is not repaired, the manufacturer shall do one of the following, whichever is appropriate:

(a) At the direction of a consumer described under RCW 19.184.010(2) (a), (b), or (c), do one of the following:

(i) Accept return of the wheelchair and replace the wheelchair with a comparable new wheelchair and refund any collateral costs; or

(ii) Accept return of the wheelchair and refund to the consumer and to a holder of a perfected security interest in the consumer's wheelchair, as their interest may appear, the full purchase price plus any finance charge, amount paid by the consumer at the point of sale, and collateral costs, less a reasonable allowance for use. Under this subsection (2)(a)(ii), a reasonable allowance for use may not exceed the amount obtained by multiplying the full purchase price of the wheelchair by a fraction, the denominator of which is one thousand eight hundred twenty-five and the numerator of which is the number of days that the wheelchair was driven before the consumer first reported the nonconformity to the wheelchair dealer; or

(b)(i) For a consumer described in RCW 19.184.010(2)(d), accept return of the wheelchair, refund to the wheelchair lessor and to a holder of a perfected security interest in the wheelchair, as their interest may appear, the current value of the written lease and refund to the consumer the amount that the consumer paid under the written lease plus any collateral costs, less a reasonable allowance for use.

(ii) Under this subsection (2)(b), the current value of the written lease equals the total amount for which the lease obligates the consumer during the period of the lease remaining after its early termination, plus the wheelchair dealer's early termination costs and the value of the wheelchair at the lease expiration date if the lease sets forth the value, less the wheelchair lessor's early termination savings.

(iii) Under this subsection (2)(b), a reasonable allowance for use may not exceed the amount obtained by multiplying the total amount for which the written lease obligates the consumer by a fraction, the denominator of which is one thousand eight hundred twenty-five and the numerator of which is the number of days that the consumer drove the wheelchair before first reporting the nonconformity to the manufacturer, wheelchair lessor, or wheelchair dealer.

(3) To receive a comparable new wheelchair or a refund due under subsection (2)(a) of this section, a consumer described under RCW 19.184.010(2) (a), (b), or (c) shall offer to the manufacturer of the wheelchair having the nonconformity to transfer possession of the wheelchair to the manufacturer. Within thirty days after the offer, the manufacturer shall provide the consumer with a comparable new wheelchair or a refund. When the manufacturer provides a new wheelchair or refund under this subsection, the consumer shall return to the manufacturer the wheelchair having the nonconformity.

(4)(a) To receive a refund due under subsection (2)(b) of this section, a consumer described under RCW 19.184.010(2)(d) shall offer to return the wheelchair having the nonconformity to its manufacturer. Within thirty days after the offer, the manufacturer shall provide the refund to the consumer. When the manufacturer provides the refund, the consumer shall return to the manufacturer the wheelchair having the nonconformity.

(b) To receive a refund due under subsection (2)(b) of this section, a wheelchair lessor shall offer to transfer possession of the wheelchair having the nonconformity to the manufacturer. Within thirty days after the offer, the manufacturer shall provide a refund to the wheelchair lessor. When the manufacturer provides the refund, the wheelchair lessor shall provide to the manufacturer the endorsements necessary to transfer legal possession to the manufacturer.

(c) A person may not enforce the lease against the consumer after the consumer receives a refund due under subsection (2)(b) of this section.

(5) A person may not sell or lease again in this state a wheelchair returned by a consumer or wheelchair lessor in this state under subsection (2) of this section or by a consumer or wheelchair lessor in another state under a similar law of that state, unless full disclosure of the reasons for return is made to a prospective buyer or lessee.

[ 1995 c 14 s 3; 1994 c 104 s 3.]